North Carolina, session 2025, SB230.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-277.1(a2) reads as rewritten:
"(a2) Income Eligibility Limit. – For the taxable year beginning on July 1, 2008, 2025, the
income eligibility limit is twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). forty-eight thousand dollars
($48,000). For taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2009, 2026, the income eligibility limit
is the amount for the preceding year, adjusted by the same percentage of this amount as the
percentage of any cost-of-living adjustment made to the benefits under Titles II and XVI of the
Social Security Act for the preceding calendar year, rounded to the nearest one hundred dollars
($100.00). On or before July 1 of each year, the Department of Revenue must determine the
income eligibility amount to be in effect for the taxable year beginning the following July 1 and
must notify the assessor of each county of the amount to be in effect for that taxable year."
SECTION 2. This act is effective for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on
or after July 1, 2025.
*S230-v-1*